California statutes. Commercial Code
(1) The receiving bank is obliged to issue, on the execution date, a payment order complying with the sender’s order and to follow the sender’s instructions concerning (i) any intermediary bank or funds-transfer system to be used in carrying out the funds transfer, or (ii) the means by which payment orders are to be transmitted in the funds transfer. If the originator’s bank issues a payment order to an intermediary bank, the originator’s bank is obliged to instruct the intermediary bank according to the instruction of the originator. An intermediary bank in the funds transfer is similarly bound by an instruction given to it by the sender of the payment order it accepts.

(2) If the sender’s
 instruction states that the funds transfer is to be carried out telephonically or by wire transfer or otherwise indicates that the funds transfer is to be carried out by the most expeditious means, the receiving bank is obliged to transmit its payment order by the most expeditious available means, and to instruct any intermediary bank accordingly. If a sender’s instruction states a payment date, the receiving bank is obliged to transmit its payment order at a time and by means reasonably necessary to allow payment to the beneficiary on the payment date or as soon thereafter as is feasible.

(b) Unless otherwise instructed, a receiving bank executing a payment order may (i) use any funds-transfer system if use of that system is reasonable in the circumstances, and (ii) issue a payment order to the beneficiary’s bank or to an intermediary bank through which a payment order conforming to the sender’s order can expeditiously be issued to the beneficiary’s bank if the receiving bank
 exercises ordinary care in the selection of the intermediary bank. A receiving bank is not required to follow an instruction of the sender designating a funds-transfer system to be used in carrying out the funds transfer if the receiving bank, in good faith, determines that it is not feasible to follow the instruction or that following the instruction would unduly delay completion of the funds transfer.

(c) Unless paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) applies or the receiving bank is otherwise instructed, the bank may execute a payment order by transmitting its payment order by first-class mail or by any means reasonable in the circumstances. If the receiving bank is instructed to execute the sender’s order by transmitting its payment order by a particular means, the receiving bank may issue its payment order by the means stated or by any means as expeditious as the means stated.

(d) Unless instructed by the sender, (i) the receiving bank may not obtain
 payment of its charges for services and expenses in connection with the execution of the sender’s order by issuing a payment order in an amount equal to the amount of the sender’s order less the amount of the charges, and (ii) may not instruct a subsequent receiving bank to obtain payment of its charges in the same manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11303.

(a) A receiving bank that (i) executes the payment order of the sender by issuing a payment order in an amount greater than the amount of the sender’s order, or (ii) issues a payment order in execution of the sender’s order and then issues a duplicate order, is entitled to payment of the amount of the sender’s order under subdivision (c) of Section 11402 if that subdivision is otherwise satisfied. The bank is entitled to recover from the beneficiary of the erroneous order the excess payment received to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

(b) A receiving bank that executes the payment order of the sender by issuing a payment order in an amount less than the amount of the sender’s order is entitled to payment of the amount of the sender’s order under subdivision (c) of Section 11402 if (i) that subdivision is otherwise satisfied and (ii) the bank corrects its mistake by issuing an additional payment order for the
 benefit of the beneficiary of the sender’s order. If the error is not corrected, the issuer of the erroneous order is entitled to receive or retain payment from the sender of the order it accepted only to the extent of the amount of the erroneous order. This subdivision does not apply if the receiving bank executes the sender’s payment order by issuing a payment order in an amount less than the amount of the sender’s order for the purpose of obtaining payment of its charges for services and expenses pursuant to instruction of the sender.

(c) If a receiving bank executes the payment order of the sender by issuing a payment order to a beneficiary different from the beneficiary of the sender’s order and the funds transfer is completed on the basis of that error, the sender of the payment order that was erroneously executed and all previous senders in the funds transfer are not obliged to pay the payment orders they issued. The issuer of the erroneous order is entitled to recover
 from the beneficiary of the order the payment received to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11304.

If the sender of a payment order that is erroneously executed as stated in Section 11303 receives notification from the receiving bank that the order was executed or that the sender’s account was debited with respect to the order, the sender has a duty to exercise ordinary care to determine, on the basis of information available to the sender, that the order was erroneously executed and to notify the bank of the relevant facts within a reasonable time not exceeding 90 days after the notification from the bank was received by the sender. If the sender fails to perform that duty, the bank is not obliged to pay interest on any amount refundable to the sender under subdivision (d) of Section 11402 for the period before the bank learns of the execution error. The bank is not entitled to any recovery from the sender on account of a failure by the sender to perform the duty stated in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11305.

(a) If a funds transfer is completed but execution of a payment order by the receiving bank in breach of Section 11302 results in delay in payment to the beneficiary, the bank is obliged to pay interest to either the originator or the beneficiary of the funds transfer for the period of delay caused by the improper execution. Except as provided in subdivision (c), additional damages are not recoverable.

(b) If execution of a payment order by a receiving bank in breach of Section 11302 results in (i) noncompletion of the funds transfer, (ii) failure to use an intermediary bank designated by the originator, or (iii) issuance of a payment order that
 does not comply with the terms of the payment order of the originator, the bank is liable to the originator for its expenses in the funds transfer and for incidental expenses and interest losses, to the extent not covered by subdivision (a), resulting from the improper execution. Except as provided in subdivision (c), additional damages are not recoverable.

(c) In addition to the amounts payable under subdivisions (a) and (b), damages, including consequential damages, are recoverable to the extent provided in an express agreement of the receiving bank, evidenced by a record.

(d) If a receiving bank fails to execute a payment order it was obliged by express agreement to execute, the receiving bank is liable to the sender for its expenses in the transaction and for incidental
 expenses and interest losses resulting from the failure to execute. Additional damages, including consequential damages, are recoverable to the extent provided in an express agreement of the receiving bank, evidenced by a record, but are not otherwise recoverable.

(e) Reasonable attorney’s fees are recoverable if demand for compensation under subdivision (a) or (b) is made and refused before an action is brought on the claim. If a claim is made for breach of an agreement under subdivision (d) and the agreement does not provide for damages, reasonable attorney’s fees are recoverable if demand for compensation under subdivision (d) is made and refused before an action is brought on the claim.

(f) Except as stated in this section, the liability of a receiving bank under subdivisions (a)
 and (b) may not be varied by agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 89.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Payment [11401. - 11406.]

11401.

“Payment date” of a payment order means the day on which the amount of the order is payable to the beneficiary by the beneficiary’s bank. The payment date may be determined by instruction of the sender but cannot be earlier than the day the order is received by the beneficiary’s bank and, unless otherwise determined, is the day the order is received by the beneficiary’s bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.

(a) This section is subject to Sections 11205 and 11207.

(b) With respect to a payment order issued to the beneficiary’s bank, acceptance of the order by the bank obliges the sender to pay the bank the amount of the order, but payment is not due until the payment date of the order.

(c) This subdivision is subject to subdivision (e) and to Section 11303. With respect to a payment order issued to a receiving bank other than the beneficiary’s bank, acceptance of the order by the receiving bank obliges the sender to pay the bank the amount of the sender’s order. Payment by the sender is not due until the execution date of the sender’s order. The obligation of that sender to pay its payment order is excused if the funds transfer is not completed by acceptance by the beneficiary’s bank of a payment order instructing payment to the beneficiary of that sender’s payment order.

(d) If the
 sender of a payment order pays the order and was not obliged to pay all or part of the amount paid, the bank receiving payment is obliged to refund payment to the extent the sender was not obliged to pay. Except as provided in Sections 11204 and 11304, interest is payable on the refundable amount from the date of payment.

(e) If a funds transfer is not completed as stated in subdivision (c) and an intermediary bank is obliged to refund payment as stated in subdivision (d) but is unable to do so because it is not permitted by applicable law or because the bank suspends payments, a sender in the funds transfer that executed a payment order in compliance with an instruction, as stated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11302, to route the funds transfer through that intermediary bank is entitled to receive or retain payment from the sender of the payment order that it accepted. The first sender in the funds transfer that issued an instruction requiring routing through
 that intermediary bank is subrogated to the right of the bank that paid the intermediary bank to refund as stated in subdivision (d).

(f) The right of the sender of a payment order to be excused from the obligation to pay the order as stated in subdivision (c) or to receive refund under subdivision (d) may not be varied by agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.

(a) Payment of the sender’s obligation under Section 11402 to pay the receiving bank occurs as follows:

(1) If the sender is a bank, payment occurs when the receiving bank receives final settlement of the obligation through a Federal Reserve Bank or through a funds-transfer system.

(2) If the sender is a bank and the sender (i) credited an account of the receiving bank with the sender, or (ii) caused an account of the receiving bank in another bank to be credited, payment occurs when the credit is withdrawn or, if not withdrawn, at midnight of the day on which the credit is withdrawable and the receiving bank learns of that fact.

(3) If the receiving bank debits an account of the sender with the receiving bank, payment occurs when the debit is made to the extent the debit is covered by a withdrawable credit balance in the account.

(b) If the sender and
 receiving bank are members of a funds-transfer system that nets obligations multilaterally among participants, the receiving bank receives final settlement when settlement is complete in accordance with the rules of the system. The obligation of the sender to pay the amount of a payment order transmitted through the funds-transfer system may be satisfied, to the extent permitted by the rules of the system, by setting off and applying against the sender’s obligation the right of the sender to receive payment from the receiving bank of the amount of any other payment order transmitted to the sender by the receiving bank through the funds-transfer system. The aggregate balance of obligations owed by each sender to each receiving bank in the funds-transfer system may be satisfied, to the extent permitted by the rules of the system, by setting off and applying against that balance the aggregate balance of obligations owed to the sender by other members of the system. The aggregate balance is determined after the
 right of setoff stated in the second sentence of this subdivision has been exercised.

(c) If two banks transmit payment orders to each other under an agreement that settlement of the obligations of each bank to the other under Section 11402 will be made at the end of the day or other period, the total amount owed with respect to all orders transmitted by one bank shall be set off against the total amount owed with respect to all orders transmitted by the other bank. To the extent of the setoff, each bank has made payment to the other.

(d) In a case not covered by subdivision (a), the time when payment of the sender’s obligation under subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 11402 occurs is governed by applicable principles of law that determine when an obligation is satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.

(a) Subject to subdivision (e) of Section 11211, and subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 11405, if a beneficiary’s bank accepts a payment order, the bank is obliged to pay the amount of the order to the beneficiary of the order. Payment is due on the payment date of the order, but if acceptance occurs on the payment date after the close of the funds-transfer business day of the bank, payment is due on the next funds-transfer business day. If the bank refuses to pay after demand by the beneficiary and receipt of notice of particular circumstances that will give rise to consequential damages as a result of nonpayment, the beneficiary may recover damages resulting from the refusal to pay to the extent the bank had notice of the damages, unless the bank proves that it did not pay because of a reasonable doubt concerning the right of the beneficiary to payment.

(b) If a payment order accepted by the beneficiary’s bank instructs payment to an
 account of the beneficiary, the bank is obliged to notify the beneficiary of receipt of the order before midnight of the next funds-transfer business day following the payment date. If the payment order does not instruct payment to an account of the beneficiary, the bank is required to notify the beneficiary only if notice is required by the order. Notice may be given by first-class mail or any other means reasonable in the circumstances. If the bank fails to give the required notice, the bank is obliged to pay interest to the beneficiary on the amount of the payment order from the day notice should have been given until the day the beneficiary learned of receipt of the payment order by the bank. No other damages are recoverable. Reasonable attorney’s fees are also recoverable if demand for interest is made and refused before an action is brought on the claim.

(c) The right of a beneficiary to receive payment and damages as stated in subdivision (a) may not be varied by agreement
 or a funds-transfer system rule. The right of a beneficiary to be notified as stated in subdivision (b) may be varied by agreement of the beneficiary or by a funds-transfer system rule if the beneficiary is notified of the rule before initiation of the funds transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11405.

(a) If the beneficiary’s bank credits an account of the beneficiary of a payment order, payment of the bank’s obligation under subdivision (a) of Section 11404 occurs when and to the extent (i) the beneficiary is notified of the right to withdraw the credit, (ii) the bank lawfully applies the credit to a debt of the beneficiary, or (iii) funds with respect to the order are otherwise made available to the beneficiary by the bank.

(b) If the beneficiary’s bank does not credit an account of the beneficiary of a payment order, the time when payment of the bank’s obligation under subdivision (a) of Section 11404 occurs is governed by principles of law that determine when an obligation is satisfied.

(c) Except as stated in subdivisions (d) and (e), if the beneficiary’s bank pays the beneficiary of a payment order under a condition to payment or agreement of the beneficiary giving the bank the right to recover payment
 from the beneficiary if the bank does not receive payment of the order, the condition to payment or agreement is not enforceable.

(d) A funds-transfer system rule may provide that payments made to beneficiaries of funds transfers made through the system are provisional until receipt of payment by the beneficiary’s bank of the payment order it accepted. A beneficiary’s bank that makes a payment that is provisional under the rule is entitled to refund from the beneficiary if (i) the rule requires that both the beneficiary and the originator be given notice of the provisional nature of the payment before the funds transfer is initiated, (ii) the beneficiary, the beneficiary’s bank and the originator’s bank agreed to be bound by the rule, and (iii) the beneficiary’s bank did not receive payment of the payment order that it accepted. If the beneficiary is obliged to refund payment to the beneficiary’s bank, acceptance of the payment order by the beneficiary’s bank is nullified and no
 payment by the originator of the funds transfer to the beneficiary occurs under Section 11406.

(e) This subdivision applies to a funds transfer that includes a payment order transmitted over a funds-transfer system that (i) nets obligations multilaterally among participants, and (ii) has in effect a loss-sharing agreement among participants for the purpose of providing funds necessary to complete settlement of the obligations of one or more participants that do not meet their settlement obligations. If the beneficiary’s bank in the funds transfer accepts a payment order and the system fails to complete settlement pursuant to its rules with respect to any payment order in the funds transfer, (i) the acceptance by the beneficiary’s bank is nullified and no person has any right or obligation based on the acceptance, (ii) the beneficiary’s bank is entitled to recover payment from the beneficiary, (iii) no payment by the originator to the beneficiary occurs under Section 11406, and
 (iv) subject to subdivision (e) of Section 11402, each sender in the funds transfer is excused from its obligation to pay its payment order under subdivision (c) of Section 11402 because the funds transfer has not been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11406.

(a) Subject to subdivision (e) of Section 11211 and subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 11405, the originator of a funds transfer pays the beneficiary of the originator’s payment order (i) at the time a payment order for the benefit of the beneficiary is accepted by the beneficiary’s bank in the funds transfer and (ii) in an amount equal to the amount of the order accepted by the beneficiary’s bank, but not more than the amount of the originator’s order.

(b) If payment under subdivision (a) is made to satisfy an obligation, the obligation is discharged to the same extent discharge would result from payment to the beneficiary of the same amount in money, unless (i) the payment under subdivision (a) was made by a means prohibited by the contract of the beneficiary with respect to the obligation, (ii) the beneficiary, within a reasonable time after receiving notice of receipt of the order by the beneficiary’s bank, notified the originator of
 the beneficiary’s refusal of the payment, (iii) funds with respect to the order were not withdrawn by the beneficiary or applied to a debt of the beneficiary, and (iv) the beneficiary would suffer a loss that could reasonably have been avoided if payment had been made by a means complying with the contract. If payment by the originator does not result in discharge under this section, the originator is subrogated to the rights of the beneficiary to receive payment from the beneficiary’s bank under subdivision (a) of Section 11404.

(c) For the purpose of determining whether discharge of an obligation occurs under subdivision (b), if the beneficiary’s bank accepts a payment order in an amount equal to the amount of the originator’s payment order less charges of one or more receiving banks in the funds transfer, payment to the beneficiary is deemed to be in the amount of the originator’s order unless upon demand by the beneficiary the originator does not pay the beneficiary the
 amount of the deducted charges.

(d) Rights of the originator or of the beneficiary of a funds transfer under this section may be varied only by agreement of the originator and the beneficiary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Miscellaneous Provisions [11501. - 11507.]

11501.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the rights and obligations of a party to a funds transfer may be varied by agreement of the affected party.

(b) “Funds-transfer system rule” means a rule of an association of banks (i) governing transmission of payment orders by means of a funds-transfer system of the association or rights and obligations with respect to those orders, or (ii) to the extent the rule governs rights and obligations between banks that are parties to a funds transfer in which a Federal Reserve Bank, acting as an intermediary bank, sends a payment order to the beneficiary’s bank. Except as otherwise provided in this division, a funds-transfer system rule governing rights and obligations between participating banks using the system may be effective even if the rule conflicts with this division and indirectly affects another party to the funds transfer who does not consent to the rule. A funds-transfer system rule
 may also govern rights and obligations of parties other than participating banks using the system to the extent stated in subdivision (c) of Section 11404, subdivision (d) of Section 11405, and subdivision (c) of Section 11507.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.

(a) As used in this section, “creditor process” means levy, attachment, garnishment, notice of lien, sequestration, or similar process issued by or on behalf of a creditor or other claimant with respect to an account. 

(b) This subdivision applies to creditor process with respect to an authorized account of the sender of a payment order if the creditor process is served on the receiving bank. For the purpose of determining rights with respect to the creditor process, if the receiving bank accepts the payment order the balance in the authorized account is deemed to be reduced by the amount of the payment order to the extent the bank did not otherwise receive payment of the order, unless the creditor process is served at a time and in a manner affording the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on it before the bank accepts the payment order.

(c) If a beneficiary’s bank has received a payment order for payment to
 the beneficiary’s account in the bank, the following rules apply:

(1) The bank may credit the beneficiary’s account. The amount credited may be set off against an obligation owed by the beneficiary to the bank or may be applied to satisfy creditor process served on the bank with respect to the account. 

(2) The bank may credit the beneficiary’s account and allow withdrawal of the amount credited unless creditor process with respect to the account is served at a time and in a manner affording the bank a reasonable opportunity to act to prevent withdrawal.

(3) If creditor process with respect to the beneficiary’s account has been served and the bank has had a reasonable opportunity to act on it, the bank may not reject the payment order except for a reason unrelated to the service of process.

(d) Creditor process with respect to a payment by the originator to the beneficiary pursuant to a funds
 transfer may be served only on the beneficiary’s bank with respect to the debt owed by that bank to the beneficiary. Any other bank served with the creditor process is not obliged to act with respect to the process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

For proper cause and in compliance with applicable law, a court may restrain (i) a person from issuing a payment order to initiate a funds transfer, (ii) an originator’s bank from executing the payment order of the originator, or (iii) the beneficiary’s bank from releasing funds to the beneficiary or the beneficiary from withdrawing the funds. A court may not otherwise restrain a person from issuing a payment order, paying or receiving payment of a payment order, or otherwise acting with respect to a funds transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11504.

(a) If a receiving bank has received more than one payment order of the sender or one or more payment orders and other items that are payable from the sender’s account, the bank may charge the sender’s account with respect to the various orders and items in any sequence.

(b) In determining whether a credit to an account has been withdrawn by the holder of the account or applied to a debt of the holder of the account, credits first made to the account are first withdrawn or applied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11505.

If a receiving bank has received payment from its customer with respect to a payment order issued in the name of the customer as sender and accepted by the bank, and the customer received notification reasonably identifying the order, the customer is precluded from asserting that the bank is not entitled to retain the payment unless the customer notifies the bank of the customer’s objection to the payment within one year after the notification was received by the customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11506.

(a) If, under this division, a receiving bank is obliged to pay interest with respect to a payment order issued to the bank, the amount payable may be determined (i) by agreement of the sender and receiving bank, or (ii) by a funds-transfer system rule if the payment order is transmitted through a funds-transfer system.

(b) If the amount of interest is not determined by an agreement or rule as stated in subdivision (a), the amount is calculated by multiplying the applicable federal funds rate by the amount on which interest is payable, and then multiplying the product by the number of days for which interest is payable. The applicable federal funds rate is the average of the federal funds rates published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York for each of the days for which interest is payable divided by 360. The federal funds rate for any day on which a published rate is not available is the same as the published rate for the next preceding
 day for which there is a published rate. If a receiving bank that accepted a payment order is required to refund payment to the sender of the order because the funds transfer was not completed, but the failure to complete was not due to any fault by the bank, the interest payable is reduced by a percentage equal to the reserve requirement on deposits of the receiving bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11507.

(a) The following rules apply unless the affected parties otherwise agree or subdivision (c) applies:

(1) The rights and obligations between the sender of a payment order and the receiving bank are governed by the law of the jurisdiction in which the receiving bank is located.

(2) The rights and obligations between the beneficiary’s bank and the beneficiary are governed by the law of the jurisdiction in which the beneficiary’s bank is located.

(3) The issue of when payment is made pursuant to a funds transfer by the originator to the beneficiary is governed by the law of the jurisdiction in which the beneficiary’s bank is located.

(b) If the parties described in each paragraph of subdivision (a) have made an agreement selecting the law of a particular jurisdiction to govern rights and obligations between each other, the law of that jurisdiction governs
 those rights and obligations, whether or not the payment order or the funds transfer bears a reasonable relation to that jurisdiction.

(c) A funds-transfer system rule may select the law of a particular jurisdiction to govern (i) rights and obligations between participating banks with respect to payment orders transmitted or processed through the system, or (ii) the rights and obligations of some or all parties to a funds transfer any part of which is carried out by means of the system. A choice of law made pursuant to clause (i) is binding on participating banks. A choice of law made pursuant to clause (ii) is binding on the originator, other sender, or a receiving bank having notice that the funds-transfer system might be used in the funds transfer and of the choice of law by the system when the originator, other sender, or receiving bank issued or accepted a payment order. The beneficiary of a funds transfer is bound by the choice of law if, when the funds transfer is
 initiated, the beneficiary has notice that the funds-transfer system might be used in the funds transfer and of the choice of law by the system. The law of a jurisdiction selected pursuant to this subdivision may govern, whether or not that law bears a reasonable relation to the matter in issue.

(d) In the event of inconsistency between an agreement under subdivision (b) and a choice-of-law rule under subdivision (c), the agreement under subdivision (b) prevails.

(e) If a funds transfer is made by use of more than one funds-transfer system and there is inconsistency between choice-of-law rules of the systems, the matter in issue is governed by the law of the selected jurisdiction that has the most significant relationship to the matter in issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORDS [12101. - 12107.]

12101.

This division may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code—Controllable Electronic Records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 90.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12102.

(a) In this division, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Controllable electronic record” means a record stored in an electronic medium that can be subjected to control under Section 12105. The term does not include a controllable account, a controllable payment intangible, a deposit account, an electronic copy of a record evidencing chattel paper, an electronic document of title, electronic money, investment property, or a transferable record.

(2) “Qualifying purchaser” means a purchaser of a controllable electronic record or an interest in a controllable electronic record that obtains control of the
 controllable electronic record for value, in good faith, and without notice of a claim of a property right in the controllable electronic record.

(3) “Transferable record” has the meaning provided for that term in either of the following:

(A) Paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 7021 of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(B) Subsection (a) of Section 16 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act of any state whose law is applicable.

(4) “Value” has the meaning provided in
 subdivision (a) of Section 3303, as if references in that subdivision to an “instrument” were references to a controllable account, controllable electronic record, or controllable payment intangible.

(b) The definitions in Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of “account debtor,” “controllable account,” “controllable
 payment intangible,” “chattel paper,” “deposit account,” “electronic money,” and “investment property” apply to this division.

(c) Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 90.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12103.

(a) If there is conflict between this division and Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), Division 9 governs.

(b) A transaction subject to this division is subject to all of the following:

(1) Any applicable rule of law that establishes a different rule for consumers.

(2) Any other statute or regulation that regulates the rates, charges, agreements, and practices for loans, credit sales, or other extensions of credit.

(3) Any consumer-protection statute or
 regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 90.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12104.

(a) This section applies to the acquisition and purchase of rights in a controllable account or controllable payment intangible, including the rights and benefits under subdivisions (c), (d), (e), (g), and (h) of a purchaser and qualifying purchaser, in the same manner this section applies to a controllable electronic record.

(b) To determine whether a purchaser of a controllable account or a controllable payment intangible is a qualifying purchaser, the purchaser obtains control of the account or payment intangible if it obtains control of the controllable electronic record that evidences the account or payment intangible.

(c) Except as provided in this section, law other than this division determines whether a person acquires a right in a controllable electronic record and the right the person acquires.

(d) A purchaser of a controllable electronic record acquires all rights in the controllable electronic record that the transferor had or had power to transfer, except that a purchaser of a limited interest in a controllable electronic record acquires rights only to the extent of the interest purchased.

(e) A qualifying purchaser acquires its rights in the controllable electronic record free of a claim of a property right in the controllable electronic record.

(f) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) and (e) for a controllable
 account and a controllable payment intangible or law other than this division, a qualifying purchaser takes a right to payment, right to performance, or other interest in property evidenced by the controllable electronic record subject to a claim of a property right in the right to payment, right to performance, or other interest in property.

(g) An action may not be asserted against a qualifying purchaser based on both a purchase by the qualifying purchaser of a controllable electronic record and a claim of a property right in another controllable electronic record, whether the action is framed in conversion, replevin, constructive trust, equitable lien, or other theory.

(h) Filing of a financing statement under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) is not notice of a claim
 of a property right in a controllable electronic record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 90.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12105.

(a) A person has control of a controllable electronic record if the electronic record, a record attached to or logically associated with the electronic record, or a system in which the electronic record is recorded, satisfies each of the following conditions:

(1) It gives the person both of the following:

(A) Power to avail itself of substantially all the benefit from the electronic record.

(B) Exclusive power, subject to subdivision (b), to do both of the following:

(i) Prevent others from
 availing themselves of substantially all the benefit from the electronic record.

(ii) Transfer control of the electronic record to another person or cause another person to obtain control of another controllable electronic record as a result of the transfer of the electronic record.

(2) It enables the person readily to identify itself in any way, including by name, identifying number, cryptographic key, office, or account number, as having the powers specified in paragraph (1).

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), a power is exclusive under clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) even if either of the following is true:

(1) The
 controllable electronic record, a record attached to or logically associated with the electronic record, or a system in which the electronic record is recorded limits the use of the electronic record or has a protocol programmed to cause a change, including a transfer or loss of control or a modification of benefits afforded by the electronic record.

(2) The power is shared with another person.

(c) A power of a person is not shared with another person under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and the person’s power is not exclusive if each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The person can exercise the power only if the power also is exercised by the other person.

(2) Either of the following is true:

(A) The other person can exercise the power without exercise of the power by the person.

(B) The other person is the transferor to the person of an interest in the controllable electronic record or a controllable account or controllable payment intangible evidenced by the controllable electronic record.

(d) If a person has the powers specified in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the powers are presumed to be exclusive.

(e) A person has control of a controllable electronic record if another person, other than the transferor to the person of an interest in the
 controllable electronic record or a controllable account or controllable payment intangible evidenced by the controllable electronic record, satisfies either of the following conditions:

(1) The other person has control of the electronic record and acknowledges that it has control on behalf of the person.

(2) The other person obtains control of the electronic record after having acknowledged that it will obtain control of the electronic record on behalf of the person.

(f) A person that has control under this section is not required to acknowledge that it has control on behalf of another person.
